District of Columbia statutes.
47-369.02

Increases to appropriations.

(a)

Beginning in fiscal year 2009 and each fiscal year thereafter, consistent with revenue collections, the amount appropriated as District of Columbia Funds may be increased—

(1)

by an aggregate amount of not more than 25 percent, in the case of amounts proposed to be allocated as “Other-Type Funds” in the annual Proposed Budget and Financial Plan submitted to Congress by the District of Columbia; and

(2)

by an aggregate amount of not more than 6 percent, in the case of any other amounts proposed to be allocated in such Proposed Budget and Financial Plan.

(b)

The District of Columbia may obligate and expend any increase in the amount of funds authorized under this section only in accordance with the following conditions:

(1)

The Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia shall certify—

(A)

the increase in revenue; and

(B)

that the use of the amounts is not anticipated to have a negative impact on the long-term financial, fiscal, or economic health of the District.

(2)

The amounts shall be obligated and expended in accordance with laws enacted by the Council of the District of Columbia in support of each such obligation and expenditure, consistent with the requirements of this subchapter.

(3)

The amounts may not be used to fund any agencies of the District government operating under court-ordered receivership.

(4)

The amounts may not be obligated or expended unless the Mayor has notified the Committees on Appropriations of the House of Representatives and the Senate not fewer than 30 days in advance of the obligation or expenditure.

History

Mar. 11, 2009, 123 Stat. 699, Pub. L. 111-8, § 817
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 301, 59 DCR 6190

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) increase in dedicated tax appropriations for the Housing Production Trust Fund, see § 2 of the Housing Production Trust Fund Dedicated Tax Appropriations Authorization Temporary Act of 2011 (D.C. Law 19-14, Aug. 17, 2011, 58 DCR 5383).
For temporary (225 days) FY 2013 Revised Budget Request adjustment, see § 2 of the Fiscal Year 2013 Revised Budget Request Temporary Adjustment Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 20-14, September 19, 2013, 60 DCR 9554, 20 DCSTAT 1764).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Housing Production Trust Fund Dedicated Tax Appropriations Authorization Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-66, May 13, 2011, 58 DCR 4250).
For temporary (90 days) FY 2013 Revised Budget Request adjustment, see § 2 of the Fiscal Year 2013 Revised Budget Request Emergency Adjustment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-74, May 23, 2013, 60 DCR 7592, 20 DCSTAT 1424).

Editor's Notes

Section 301 of D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.